Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.470

Electronic wills—Qualified custodians—Duties.

(1) The qualified custodian of an electronic will shall, within 30 days after he or she receives knowledge of the death of the testator:

(a) Deliver said electronic will to the court having jurisdiction or to the person named in the electronic will as executor; and

(b) Make an affidavit before any person authorized to administer oaths, stating (i) the manner in which the qualified custodian received the electronic will; (ii) that the electronic will was at all times in the custody of the qualified custodian; and (iii) that the electronic will in the possession of the qualified custodian has not been altered in any way since the custodian received the electronic will. Such affidavit must be delivered with the electronic will to the court having jurisdiction or the person named as executor under the electronic will.

(2) Any person who willfully violates any of the provisions of this section is liable to any party aggrieved for the damages which may be sustained by such violation.

[ 2021 c 140 s 1008.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 140 ss 1001-1016: See note following RCW 11.12.400.